test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_N_IMPER_gwekishin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - N - gwekishin - IMPER :

  #Template Key
  #1
  #imperative

     #Isolation form
     gwekishin: gwekishin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     gwekishin+Imm21: gwekishindaa
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl: gwekishing
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg: gwekishinn
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     gwekishin+Del2Pl: gwekishinkag
     gwekishin+Del2Sg: gwekishinkan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     gwekishin+Prob21: gwekishinsiidaa
     gwekishin+Prob2Pl: gwekishinkegon
     gwekishin+Prob2Sg: gwekishinken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     gwekishin+Imm21+Del2Pl: gwekishindaakag
     gwekishin+Imm21+Del2Sg: gwekishindaakan
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl: gwekishingkag
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg: gwekishingkan
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl: gwekishinnkag
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg: gwekishinnkan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     gwekishin+Imm21+Prob21: gwekishindaasiidaa
     gwekishin+Imm21+Prob2Pl: gwekishindaakegon
     gwekishin+Imm21+Prob2Sg: gwekishindaaken
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl+Prob21: gwekishingsiidaa
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl+Prob2Pl: gwekishingkegon
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl+Prob2Sg: gwekishingken
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg+Prob21: gwekishinnsiidaa
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg+Prob2Pl: gwekishinnkegon
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg+Prob2Sg: gwekishinnken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     gwekishin+Del2Pl+Prob21: gwekishinkagsiidaa
     gwekishin+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: gwekishinkagkegon
     gwekishin+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: gwekishinkagken
     gwekishin+Del2Sg+Prob21: gwekishinkansiidaa
     gwekishin+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: gwekishinkankegon
     gwekishin+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: gwekishinkanken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     gwekishin+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob21: gwekishindaakagsiidaa
     gwekishin+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: gwekishindaakagkegon
     gwekishin+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: gwekishindaakagken
     gwekishin+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob21: gwekishindaakansiidaa
     gwekishin+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: gwekishindaakankegon
     gwekishin+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: gwekishindaakanken
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob21: gwekishingkagsiidaa
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: gwekishingkagkegon
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: gwekishingkagken
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob21: gwekishingkansiidaa
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: gwekishingkankegon
     gwekishin+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: gwekishingkanken
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob21: gwekishinnkagsiidaa
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: gwekishinnkagkegon
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: gwekishinnkagken
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob21: gwekishinnkansiidaa
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: gwekishinnkankegon
     gwekishin+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: gwekishinnkanken
     
